Louisiana, session 2026, HB1154.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1060.1 (9) through (12) and 1060.9 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1060.1. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following definitions apply:
* * *
(9) "Board-certified physician" means a physician licensed to practice
medicine in this state who is certified by a member board of the American Board of
Medical Specialties or an equivalent certifying body recognized by the Louisiana
State Board of Medical Examiners.
(10) "Commercial insurer" means any health insurance issuer, health
maintenance organization, or other entity that offers a health benefit plan through a
policy, contract, or certificate of insurance that covers prescription drugs and is
authorized to provide health insurance coverage in this state, excluding federal, state,
or local governmental plans such as Medicaid.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1154 ENROLLED
(11) "Generic medication" means a drug that is chemically equivalent to a
brand-name drug and approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration
as interchangeable.
(12) "Prior authorization" means a utilization review process requiring
approval from the insurer before a prescribed medication can be dispensed or
reimbursed.
* * *
§1060.9. Prohibition on prior authorization for generic medications; conditions
A commercial insurer shall not require prior authorization for the dispensing
or reimbursement of a generic medication that is not an opioid, if the prescription for
the medication is issued by a board-certified physician or authorized provider whose
specialty certification includes the medical indication for which the drug is
prescribed and the wholesale acquisition cost is no more than two hundred fifty
dollars per prescription.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any new policy, contract, or
health coverage plan issued on and after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract, or health
coverage plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the provisions
of this Act on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.